Arkansas, session 2025, HB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Prohibition on different reimbursement rates by the same
type of provider in different settings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There are discrepancies between the rates paid to physicians
who see patients in an office setting when that setting is a behavioral
health agency or a certified support services provider agency and when that
setting is the physician’s office;
(2) A physician is paid more for his or her services when those
services are rendered in his or her office than when a physician provides the
same services at a behavioral health agency or a certified support services
provider agency;
(3) The services in these settings employ the same billing
*JMB121*
01/16/2025 1:47:10 PM JMB121

HB1165
codes;
(4) With some billing codes, the difference in reimbursement
rates based on the setting is quite substantial; and
(5) Behavioral health providers and certified support services
provider agencies are being paid at lower rates for the physician’s services
provided in a behavioral health setting than when the physician's services
are exactly the same as the physician would provide in his or her own office;
and
(6) This discrepancy places the provision of behavioral health
services in this state at a great disadvantage.
(b) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall not pay different
reimbursement rates for the same services performed by the same type of
provider that use the same billing codes when the only difference is the
setting in which the services are rendered.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.



















01/16/2025 1:47:10 PM JMB121